Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
CHAPTER 272A Kentucky Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act

SUBCHAPTER 1. General Provisions

272A.1-010.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Kentucky Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 1, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.1-020.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Appropriate court” means the Circuit Court for the county of the Commonwealth in which the limited cooperative association’s principal office is located or, if none, the county in which the registered office is or was last located;

“Articles of association” means the articles of association of a limited cooperative association required by KRS

272A.3-010

. The term includes the articles as amended or restated;

“Board of directors” means the board of directors of a limited cooperative association;

“Bylaws” means the bylaws of a limited cooperative association. The term includes the bylaws as amended or restated;

“Certificate of authority” means a certificate issued by the Secretary of State pursuant to KRS

14A.2-140

;

“Contribution,” except as used in KRS

272A.10-080

(3), means a benefit that a person provides to a limited cooperative association to become or remain a member or in the person’s capacity as a member;

“Cooperative” means a limited cooperative association or an entity organized under any cooperative law of any jurisdiction;

“Director” means a director of a limited cooperative association;

“Distribution,” except as used in KRS

272A.10-070

(5), means a transfer of money or other property from a limited cooperative association to a member because of the member’s financial rights or to a transferee of a member’s financial rights;

“Entity” means an entity or a foreign entity, both as defined in KRS

14A.1-070

;

“Financial rights” means the right to participate in allocations and distributions as provided in Subchapters 10 and 12 of this chapter, but does not include rights or obligations under a marketing contract governed by Subchapter 7 of this chapter;

“Foreign cooperative” means an entity organized in a jurisdiction other than this Commonwealth under a law similar to this chapter;

“Governance rights” means the right to participate in governance of a limited cooperative association;

“Investor member” means a member that has made a contribution to a limited cooperative association and:

Is not required by the organic rules to conduct patronage with the association in the member’s capacity as an investor member in order to receive the member’s interest; or

Is not permitted by the organic rules to conduct patronage with the association in the member’s capacity as an investor member in order to receive the member’s interest;

“Limited cooperative association” means an association organized under this chapter;

“Member” means a person that is admitted as a patron member or investor member, or both, in a limited cooperative association. The term does not include a person that has dissociated as a member;

“Member’s interest” means the interest of a patron member or investor member under KRS

272A.6-010

;

“Members meeting” means an annual members meeting or special meeting of members;

“Organic law” means the statute providing for the creation of an entity or principally governing its internal affairs;

“Organic rules” means the articles of association and bylaws of a limited cooperative association;

“Organizer” means an individual who signs the initial articles of association;

“Patron member” means a member that has made a contribution to a limited cooperative association and:

Is required by the organic rules to conduct patronage with the association in the member’s capacity as a patron member in order to receive the member’s interest; or

Is permitted by the organic rules to conduct patronage with the association in the member’s capacity as a patron member in order to receive the member’s interest;

“Patronage” means business transactions between a limited cooperative association and a person which entitle the person to receive financial rights based on the value or quantity of business done between the association and the person;

“Person” means an individual, entity, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity;

“Principal office” means the principal executive office of a limited cooperative association or foreign cooperative, whether or not in this state;

“Record,” used as a noun, means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form;

“Required information” means the information a limited cooperative association is required to maintain under KRS

272A.1-120

;

“Secretary” means the officer designated pursuant to KRS

272A.8-210

(2);

“Sign” means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process;

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States;

“Transfer” includes an assignment, conveyance, deed, bill of sale, lease, mortgage, security interest, encumbrance, gift, and transfer by operation of law;

“Voting group” means any combination of one (1) or more voting members in one (1) or more districts or classes that under the organic rules or under this chapter are entitled to vote and can be counted together collectively on a matter at a members meeting;

“Voting member” means a member that, under the organic law or organic rules, has a right to vote on matters subject to vote by members under the organic law or organic rules; and

“Voting power” means the total current power of members to vote on a particular matter for which a vote may or is to be taken.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 2, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.1-030.
Limited cooperative association subject to amendment or repeal of
chapter.

A limited cooperative association governed by this chapter is subject to any amendment or repeal of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 3, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.1-040.
Nature of limited cooperative association.

A limited cooperative association organized under this chapter is an autonomous, unincorporated association of persons united to meet their mutual interests through a jointly owned enterprise primarily controlled by those persons, which permits combining:

Ownership, financing, and receipt of benefits by the members for whose interests the association is formed; and

Separate investments in the association by members who may receive returns on their investments and a share of control.

The fact that a limited cooperative association does not have one (1) or more of the characteristics described in subsection (1) of this section does not alone prevent the association from being formed under and governed by this chapter, nor does it alone provide a basis for an action against the association.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 4, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.1-050.
Purpose and duration of limited cooperative association.

A limited cooperative association is an entity distinct from its members.

A limited cooperative association may be organized for any lawful purpose, whether or not for profit.

This chapter does not alter or amend any law that governs the licensing and regulation of an individual or entity in carrying on a specific business or profession even if that law permits the business or profession to be conducted by a limited cooperative association, a foreign cooperative, or its members.

A limited cooperative association may not conduct an activity that, under law of this state other than this chapter, may be conducted only by an entity that meets specific requirements for the internal affairs of that entity unless the organic rules of the association conform to those requirements.

Unless the articles of association state a term for a limited cooperative association’s existence, the association has perpetual duration.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 5, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.1-060.
Powers.

A limited cooperative association may sue and be sued in its own name and do all things necessary or convenient to carry on its activities.

An association may maintain an action against a member for harm caused to the association by the member’s violation of a duty to the association or of the organic law or organic rules.

A member of a limited cooperative association shall not be a proper party to a proceeding by or against a limited cooperative association, solely by reason of being a member of the limited cooperative association, except if the object of the proceeding is to enforce a member’s right against or liability to the limited cooperative association or as otherwise provided in an operating agreement.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 6, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.1-070.
Governing law.

The law of this Commonwealth governs:

The internal affairs of a limited cooperative association; and

The liability of a member as member and a director as director for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of a limited cooperative association.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 7, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.1-080.
Supplemental principles of law.

It shall be the policy of the General Assembly through this chapter to give maximum effect to the principles of freedom of contract and to the enforceability of organic rules. Unless displaced by particular provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity shall supplement this chapter.

Although this chapter is in derogation of common law, the rules of construction that require strict construction of statutes which are in derogation of common law shall not apply to its provisions.

This chapter shall not be construed to:

Impair the obligations of any contract existing when this chapter, or any amendment of it, becomes effective;

Affect any action or proceeding begun before the chapter or amendment takes effect; or

Affect any right accrued before the chapter or amendment takes effect.

Written organic rules may provide that the interest of any member who fails to make any contribution that the member is obligated to make or who otherwise violates an obligation undertaken in the organic rules shall be subject to specified penalties or specified consequences for failure. The penalty or consequence may take the form of:

Reducing or eliminating the defaulting member’s proportionate interest in the limited cooperative association;

Subordinating the member’s interest to that of nondefaulting members;

A forced sale of that interest;

Forfeiture of his or her interest;

The lending by other members of the amount necessary to meet the defaulting member’s commitment;

A fixing of the value of his or her interest by appraisal or by formula and redemption or sale of the interest at such; or

Other penalty or consequence.

Written organic rules may provide rights to any person, including a person who is not a member or not otherwise a party to the organic rules, to the extent set forth therein.

Except to the extent set forth in the written organic rules, a limited cooperative association is bound by and is a party to the organic rules.

Action validly taken pursuant to one (1) provision of this chapter shall not be deemed invalid solely because it is identical or similar in substance to an action that could have been taken pursuant to some other provision of this chapter but fails to satisfy one (1) or more requirements prescribed by such other provision.

No member or other person shall have a vested property right resulting from any provision of the organic rules which may not be modified by its amendment or as otherwise permitted by law.

Each party to the organic rules shall discharge all duties and exercise all rights consistently with the obligation of good faith and fair dealing. The obligation of good faith and fair dealing may not be eliminated in the organic rules, but the parties may prescribe the standards by which the performance of the obligation is to be measured provided the standards are not manifestly unreasonable.

To the extent the organic rules do not otherwise provide, this chapter shall govern relations among the limited cooperative association, the members, the directors, and the assignees.

For purposes of KRS

141.0401

, each limited cooperative association with investor members shall be a limited liability pass-through entity, except to the extent of patronage activities or dividends.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 8, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.1-090.
Relation to restraint of trade and antitrust laws.

No cooperative, foreign cooperative, or agreements between cooperatives and their members shall be considered a conspiracy, a combination in restraint of trade, an illegal monopoly, or an attempt to lessen competition, fix prices arbitrarily, or create a combination or pool in violation of any law of this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 9, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.1-100.
Name.

The name of a limited cooperative association shall satisfy the requirements of KRS

14A.3-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 10, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.1-110.
Effect of organic rules.

The relations between a limited cooperative association and its members are consensual. Unless required, limited, or prohibited by this chapter, the organic rules may provide for any matter concerning the relations among the members of the association and between the members and the association, the activities of the association, and the conduct of its activities.

The matters referred to in paragraphs (a) to (k) of this subsection may be varied only in the articles of association. The articles may:

State a term of existence for the association under KRS

272A.1-050

;

Limit or eliminate the acceptance of new or additional members by the initial board of directors under KRS 272A.3.020;

Vary the limitations on the obligations and liability of members for association obligations under KRS

272A.5-030

;

Require a notice of an annual members meeting to state a purpose of the meeting under KRS

272A.5-070

;

Vary the board of directors meeting quorum under KRS

272A.8-150

;

Vary the matters the board of directors may consider in making a decision under KRS

272A.8-190

;

Specify causes of dissolution under KRS

272A.12-020

;

Delegate amendment of the bylaws to the board of directors pursuant to KRS

272A.4-050

;

Provide for member approval of asset dispositions under KRS

272A.15-010

;

Subject to KRS

272A.8-190

, provide for the elimination or limitation of liability of a director to the association or its members for money damages pursuant to KRS

272A.8-180

;

Provide for permitting or making obligatory indemnification under KRS

272A.9-010

; and

Provide for any matters that may be contained in the organic rules, including those under subsection (3) of this section.

The matters referred to in paragraphs (a) to (y) of this subsection may be varied only in the organic rules. The organic rules may:

Require more information to be maintained under KRS

272A.1-120

or provided to members under KRS

272A.5-040

;

Provide restrictions on transactions between a member and an association under KRS

272A.1-130

;

Provide for the percentage and manner of voting on amendments to the organic rules by district, class, or voting group under KRS

272A.4-040

;

Provide for the percentage vote required to amend the bylaws concerning the admission of new members under KRS

272A.4-050

;

Provide for terms and conditions to become a member under KRS

272A.5-010

;

Restrict the manner of conducting members meetings under KRS

272A.5-050

and

272A.5-060

;

Designate the presiding officer of members meetings under KRS

272A.5-050

and

272A.5-060

;

Require a statement of purposes in the annual meeting notice under KRS

272A.5-070

;

Increase quorum requirements for members meetings under KRS

272A.5-090

and for board of directors meetings under KRS

272A.8-150

;

Allocate voting power among members, including patron members and investor members, and provide for the manner of member voting and action as permitted by

272A.5-100

,

272A.5-110

,

272A.5-120

,

272A.5-130

,

272A.5-140

, and

272A.5-150

;

Authorize investor members and expand or restrict the transferability of members’ interests to the extent provided in KRS

272A.6-020

,

272A.6-030

, and

272A.6-040

;

Provide for enforcement of a marketing contract under KRS

272A.7-040

;

Provide for qualification, election, terms, removal, filling vacancies, and member approval for compensation of directors in accordance with KRS

272A.8-030

,

272A.8-040

,

272A.8-050

,

272A.8-070

,

272A.8-090

, and

272A.8-100

;

Restrict the manner of conducting board meetings and taking action without a meeting under KRS

272A.8-110

and

272A.8-120

;

Provide for frequency, location, notice, and waivers of notice for board meetings under KRS

272A.8-130

and

272A.8-140

;

Increase the percentage of votes necessary for board action under KRS

272A.8-160

;

Provide for the creation of committees of the board of directors and matters related to the committees in accordance with KRS

272A.8-170

;

Provide for officers and their appointment, designation, and authority under KRS

272A.8-210

;

Provide for forms and values of contributions under KRS

272A.10-020

;

Provide for remedies for failure to make a contribution under KRS

272A.10-030

;

Provide for the allocation of profits and losses of the association, distributions, and the redemption or repurchase of distributed property other than money in accordance with KRS

272A.10-040

,

272A.10-050

,

272A.10-060

, and

272A.10-070

;

Specify when a member’s dissociation is wrongful and the liability incurred by the dissociating member for damage to the association under KRS

272A.11-010

(2) and (3);

Provide the personal representative, or other legal representative of, a deceased member or a member adjudged incompetent with additional rights under KRS

272A.11-030

;

Increase the percentage of votes required for board of director approval of:

A resolution to dissolve under KRS

272A.12-050

;

A proposed amendment to the organic rules under KRS

272A.4-020

;

A plan of merger under KRS

272A.16-050

(1); and

A proposed disposition of assets under KRS

272A.15-030

; and

Vary the percentage of votes required for member approval of:

A resolution to dissolve under KRS

272A.12-050

;

An amendment to the organic rules under KRS

272A.4-050

;

A plan of merger under KRS

272A.16-060

; and

A disposition of assets under KRS

272A.15-040

.

The organic rules shall address members’ contributions pursuant to KRS

272A.10-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 11, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.1-120.
Required information.

Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a limited cooperative association shall maintain in a record available at its principal office:

A list containing the name, last known street address and, if different, mailing address, and term of office of each director and officer;

The initial articles of association and all amendments to and restatements of the articles, together with a signed copy of any power of attorney under which any article, amendment, or restatement has been signed;

The initial bylaws and all amendments to and restatements of the bylaws;

All filed articles of merger and statements of conversion;

All financial statements of the association for the six (6) most recent years;

The six (6) most recent annual reports delivered by the association to the Secretary of State;

The minutes of members meetings for the six (6) most recent years;

Evidence of all actions taken by members without a meeting for the six (6) most recent years;

A list containing:

The name, in alphabetical order, and last known street address and, if different, mailing address of each patron member and each investor member; and

If the association has districts or classes of members, information from which each current member in a district or class may be identified;

The federal income tax returns, any state and local income tax returns, and any tax reports of the association for the six (6) most recent years;

Accounting records maintained by the association in the ordinary course of its operations for the six (6) most recent years;

The minutes of directors meetings for the six (6) most recent years;

Evidence of all actions taken by directors without a meeting for the six (6) most recent years;

The amount of money contributed and agreed to be contributed by each member;

A description and statement of the agreed value of contributions other than money made and agreed to be made by each member;

The times at which, or events on the happening of which, any additional contribution is to be made by each member;

For each member, a description and statement of the member’s interest or information from which the description and statement can be derived; and

All communications concerning the association made in a record to all members, or to all members in a district or class, for the six (6) most recent years.

If a limited cooperative association has existed for less than the period for which records must be maintained under subsection (1) of this section, the period records shall be kept is the period of the association’s existence.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 12, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.1-130.
Dual capacity — Business transactions of member with limited
cooperative association.

A person may have a patron member’s interest and an investor member’s interest.

When a person acts as a patron member, the person is subject to this chapter and the organic rules governing patron members.

When a person acts as an investor member, the person is subject to this chapter and the organic rules governing investor members.

Subject to KRS

272A.8-180

and

272A.8-190

and except as otherwise provided in the organic rules or a specific contract relating to a transaction, a member may lend money to and transact other business with a limited cooperative association in the same manner as a person that is not a member.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 13, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.1-140.
Registered office and agent.

A limited cooperative association shall designate and continuously maintain in this Commonwealth a registered office and agent registered in accordance with KRS

14A.4-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 14, effective July 12, 2012.

SUBCHAPTER 2. Filings with the Secretary of State

272A.2-010.
Signing of records delivered for filing to Secretary of State.

A record delivered by or on behalf of a limited cooperative association to the Secretary of State for filing shall be executed as provided in KRS

14A.2-020

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 15, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.2-020.
Signing and filing of records pursuant to judicial order.

If a person required by this chapter to sign or to deliver a record to the Secretary of State for filing does not do so, the appropriate court, upon petition of an aggrieved person, may order:

The person to sign the record and deliver it to the Secretary of State for filing; or

Delivery of the unsigned record to the Secretary of State for filing.

An aggrieved person under subsection (1) of this section, other than the limited cooperative association or foreign cooperative to which the record pertains, shall make the association or foreign cooperative a party to the action brought to obtain the order.

An unsigned record filed pursuant to this section by the Secretary of State is effective.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 16, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.2-030.
Liability for inaccurate information in filed record.

If a record delivered to the Secretary of State for filing under this chapter and filed by the Secretary of State contains inaccurate information, a person that suffers a loss by reliance on the information may recover damages for the loss from a person that signed the record or caused another to sign it on the person’s behalf and knew at the time the record was signed that the information was inaccurate.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 17, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.2-040.
Annual report for Secretary of State.

A limited cooperative association shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing an annual report as provided for in KRS

14A.6-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 18, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.2-050.
Filing fees.

The Secretary of State shall collect the following fees when the documents described in this section are delivered for filing:

Articles of association . . . . . $40.00

Amendment of articles of association . . . . . $40.00

Restatement of articles of association . . . . . $40.00

Amended restatement of articles of association . . . . . $80.00

Articles of dissolution for a domestic limited cooperative association . . . . . $40.00

Articles of merger . . . . . $50.00

Articles of correction . . . . . $20.00

Any other document required or permitted to be filed by this chapter . . . . . $15.00

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 19, effective July 12, 2012.

SUBCHAPTER 3. Organization

272A.3-010.
Organizers — Formation of limited cooperative association — Articles
of association.

A limited cooperative association shall be organized by one (1) or more organizers.

To form a limited cooperative association, an organizer of the association shall deliver articles of association to the Secretary of State for filing. The limited cooperative association is formed when articles of association that comply with subsection (3) of this section are filed by the Secretary of State, and are effective as determined under KRS

14A.2-070

.

The articles of association shall include:

The name of the association;

The purposes for which the association is formed;

The mailing address of the association’s principal office;

The name and street address of the association’s initial registered office and registered agent that comply with KRS

14A.4-010

;

The name and street address and, if different, mailing address of each organizer; and

The term for which the association is to exist if other than perpetual.

Subject to KRS

272A.1-110

, articles of association may contain any other provisions in addition to those required by subsection (3) of this section not inconsistent with this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 20, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.3-020.
Organization of limited cooperative association.

After a limited cooperative association is formed:

If initial directors are named in the articles of association, the initial directors shall hold an organizational meeting to adopt initial bylaws and carry on any other business necessary or proper to complete the organization of the association; or

If initial directors are not named in the articles of association, the organizers shall designate the initial directors and call a meeting of the initial directors to adopt initial bylaws and carry on any other business necessary or proper to complete the organization of the association.

Before the beginning of the initial meeting of the board of directors, an organizer who knows that information in the filed articles of association was inaccurate when the articles were filed or has become inaccurate due to changed circumstances shall promptly:

Cause the articles to be corrected as provided in KRS

14A.2-090

; or

Deliver an amendment to the Secretary of State for filing pursuant to KRS

272A.4-070

.

Unless the articles of association otherwise provide, the initial directors may cause the limited cooperative association to accept members, including those necessary for the association to begin business.

Initial directors need not be members.

An initial director serves until a successor is elected and qualified at a members meeting or the director is removed, resigns, is adjudged incompetent, or dies.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 21, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.3-030.
Bylaws.

Bylaws shall be in a record and, if not stated in the articles of association, shall include:

A statement of the capital structure of the limited cooperative association, including:

The classes or other types of members’ interests and relative rights, preferences, and restrictions granted to or imposed upon each class or other type of member’s interest; and

The rights to share in profits or distributions of the association;

A statement of the method for admission of members;

A statement designating voting and other governance rights, including which members have voting power and any restriction on voting power;

A statement that a member’s interest is transferable if it is to be transferable, and a statement of the conditions upon which it may be transferred;

A statement concerning the manner in which profits and losses are allocated and distributions are made among patron members and, if investor members are authorized, the manner in which profits and losses are allocated and how distributions are made among investor members and between patron members and investor members;

A statement concerning:

Whether persons that are not members but conduct business with the association may be permitted to share in allocations of profits and losses and receive distributions; and

The manner in which profits and losses are allocated and distributions are made with respect to those persons; and

A statement of the number and terms of directors or the method by which the number and terms are determined.

Subject to KRS

272A.1-110

and the articles of association, bylaws may contain any other provision for managing and regulating the affairs of the association.

In addition to amendments permitted under Subchapter 4 of this chapter, the initial board of directors may amend the bylaws by a majority vote of the directors at any time before the admission of members.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 22, effective July 12, 2012.

SUBCHAPTER 4. Amendment of Organic Rules

272A.4-010.
Authority to amend organic rules.

A limited cooperative association may amend its organic rules for any lawful purpose. In addition, the initial board of directors may amend the bylaws of an association under KRS

272A.3-030

.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a member does not have a vested property right resulting from any provision in the organic rules, including a provision relating to the management, control, capital structure, distribution, entitlement, purpose, or duration of the limited cooperative association.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 23, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.4-020.
Notice and action on amendment of organic rules.

Except as provided in KRS

272A.4-010

(1) and

272A.4-050

(6), the organic rules of a limited cooperative association may be amended only at a members meeting. An amendment may be proposed by either:

A majority of the board of directors, or a greater percentage if required by the organic rules; or

One (1) or more petitions signed by at least ten percent (10%) of the patron members or at least ten percent (10%) of the investor members.

The board of directors shall call a members meeting to consider an amendment proposed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The meeting shall be held not later than ninety (90) days following the proposal of the amendment by the board or receipt of a petition. The board shall mail or otherwise transmit or deliver in a record to each member:

The proposed amendment, or a summary of the proposed amendment and a statement of the manner in which a copy of the amendment in a record may be reasonably obtained by a member;

A recommendation that the members approve the amendment, or if the board determines that because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances it should not make a favorable recommendation, the basis for that determination;

A statement of any condition of the board’s submission of the amendment to the members; and

Notice of the meeting at which the proposed amendment will be considered, which shall be given in the same manner as notice for a special meeting of members.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 24, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.4-030.
Method of voting on amendment of organic rules.

A substantive change to a proposed amendment of the organic rules may not be made at the members meeting at which a vote on the amendment occurs.

A nonsubstantive change to a proposed amendment of the organic rules may be made at the members meeting at which the vote on the amendment occurs and need not be separately voted upon by the board of directors.

A vote to adopt a nonsubstantive change to a proposed amendment to the organic rules shall be by the same percentage of votes required to pass a proposed amendment.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 25, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.4-040.
Voting by district, class, or voting group.

This section applies if the organic rules provide for voting by district or class, or if there is one (1) or more identifiable voting groups that a proposed amendment to the organic rules would affect differently from other members with respect to matters identified in KRS

272A.4-050

(5)(a) to (e). Approval of the amendment requires the same percentage of votes of the members of that district, class, or voting group required in KRS

272A.4-050

and

272A.5-120

.

If a proposed amendment to the organic rules would affect members in two (2) or more districts or classes entitled to vote separately under subsection (1) of this section in the same or a substantially similar way, the districts or classes affected shall vote as a single voting group unless the organic rules otherwise provide for separate voting.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 26, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.4-050.
Approval of amendment.

Subject to KRS

272A.4-040

and subsections (3) and (4) of this section, an amendment to the articles of association shall be approved by:

At least two-thirds (2/3) of the voting power of members present at a members meeting called under KRS

272A.4-020

; and

If the limited cooperative association has investor members, at least a majority of the votes cast by patron members, unless the organic rules require a greater percentage vote by patron members.

Subject to KRS

272A.4-040

and subsections (3) to (6) of this section, an amendment to the bylaws shall be approved by:

At least a majority vote of the voting power of all members present at a members meeting called under KRS

272A.4-020

, unless the organic rules require a greater percentage; and

If the limited cooperative association has investor members, a majority of the votes cast by patron members, unless the organic rules require a larger affirmative vote by patron members.

The organic rules may require that the percentage of votes under subsection (1)(a) or (2)(a) of this section be:

A different percentage that is not less than a majority of members voting at the meeting;

Measured against the voting power of all members; or

A combination of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection.

Consent in a record by a member shall be delivered to a limited cooperative association before delivery of an amendment to the articles of association or restated articles of association for filing pursuant to KRS

272A.4-070

, if as a result of the amendment the member will have:

Personal liability for an obligation of the association; or

An obligation or liability for an additional contribution.

The vote required to amend bylaws shall satisfy the requirements of subsection (1) of this section if the proposed amendment modifies:

The equity capital structure of the limited cooperative association, including the rights of the association’s members to share in profits or distributions, or the relative rights, preferences, and restrictions granted to or imposed upon one (1) or more districts, classes, or voting groups of similarly situated members;

The transferability of a member’s interest;

The manner or method of allocation of profits or losses among members;

The quorum for a meeting and the rights of voting and governance; or

Unless otherwise provided in the organic rules, the terms for admission of new members.

Except for the matters described in subsection (5) of this section, the articles of association may delegate amendment of all or a part of the bylaws to the board of directors without requiring member approval.

If the articles of association delegate amendment of bylaws to the board of directors, the board shall provide a description of any amendment of the bylaws made by the board to the members in a record not later than thirty (30) days after the amendment, but the description may be provided at the next annual members meeting if the meeting is held within the thirty (30) day period.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 27, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.4-060.
Restated articles of association.

A limited cooperative association, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the board of directors taken at a meeting for which the purpose is stated in the notice of the meeting, may adopt restated articles of association that contain the original articles as previously amended. Restated articles may contain amendments if the restated articles are adopted in the same manner and with the same vote as required for amendments to the articles under KRS

272A.4-050

. Upon filing, restated articles supersede the existing articles and all amendments.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 28, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.4-070.
Amendment or restatement of articles of association — Filing.

To amend its articles of association, a limited cooperative association shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing an amendment of the articles, or restated articles of association or articles of conversion or merger pursuant to Subchapter 16 of this chapter, which contain one (1) or more amendments of the articles of association, stating:

The name of the association;

The date of filing of the association’s initial articles; and

The changes the amendment makes to the articles as most recently amended or restated.

If restated articles of association are adopted, the restated articles may be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing in the same manner as an amendment.

Upon filing, an amendment of the articles of association or other record containing an amendment of the articles which has been properly adopted by the members is effective as provided in KRS

14A.2-070

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 29, effective July 12, 2012.

SUBCHAPTER 5. Members

272A.5-010.
Members — Becoming a member.

To begin business, a limited cooperative association shall have at least two (2) patron members unless the sole member is a cooperative.

A person becomes a member:

As provided in the organic rules;

As the result of a merger or conversion under Subchapter 16 of this chapter; or

With the consent of all the members.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 30, effective July 12, 2012.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/12/2012). The reference to “Subchapter 116” in subsection (2)(b) of 2012 Ky. Acts ch. 160, sec. 30, has been changed in codification to “Subchapter 16.” This manifest clerical or typographical error has been corrected by the Reviser of Statutes under the authority of KRS 7.136(1).